src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON UpkiSuaq
    Krestr ;
+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>innaq Krestr ;
+INNAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>innarsuaq Krestr ;
+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrujussuaq   Krestr ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq       Krestr ;
+RAALLAK+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCraallak     Krestr ;
+RALAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCralaannguaq Krestr ;
+RALAAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCralaaq	Krestr ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn:%>rpiaq	Krestr ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:rpiaannaq	Krestr ;

LEXICON DemPron0	!(pik,ik,kig også dem med 'TA' foran)
+Gram/Dem+Pron+U+Der/nv:%>ngaa	IV_voq ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+U@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>kuu@U.Num.Pl@	IV_voq ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>nga	K_TUQ ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg+PALAAQ+Der/nn:%>ngapalaaq	K ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>ngarsuaq K ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>kua	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>ku	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>korsuit K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg:%>suma	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>sumarsuup Krestr ; !marloriaammik allamoorutilik issumarsuup NN20250604
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Pl:%>ku	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Pl:%>kua	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Ins+Sg:%>suminnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Ins+Pl:%>kuninnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+Sg:%>sumunnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+Pl:%>kununnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+R+Der/nv:%>sumunngar	IV_r ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+R+Der/nv:%>kununngar	IV_r ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+R+Der/nv:%>sumunnar	IV_r ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+UTE+Der/nv:%>sumunngaap	XTuteXmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+UTE+Der/nv:%>kununngaap	XTuteXmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+UTE+Der/nv:%>sumunnaap	XTuteXmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Sg:%>sumani	LokVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Pl:%>kunani	LokVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Sg+MIU+Der/nn:%>sumanimiu	Z1Zmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Pl+MIU+Der/nn:%>kunanimiu	Z1Zmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Sg:%>sumannga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Pl:%>kunannga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>sumuuna	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl:%>kunatigut	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl:%>kunuunatigut	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>kunuuna	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Sg:%>sumatut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>natut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>kunatut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>kutut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>kuatut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:%>sumaa	# ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:%>sumaak	# ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:%>sumaangaa	# ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Pl:%>korsii	# ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Pl:%>korsiiaa	# ;

LEXICON DemPron1	!(av,pav,qav,kan,qam,sam,im,ik,man,uv, også dem med 'TA' foran)
@U.Num.Sg@@U.DemPron.Sg@+Gram/Dem+Pron+U+Der/nv:@U.Num.Sg@@U.DemPron.Sg@%>naa	IV_voq ;
@U.Num.Pl@@U.DemPron.Pl@+Gram/Dem+Pron+U+Der/nv:@U.Num.Pl@@U.DemPron.Pl@%>kuu	IV_voq ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>na	K_TUQ ; 
!+INNAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>naannaq	Krestr ; !tamannaannaq
+INNAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>naannaq Krestr ; !PL20221118 pga tamannaannaanngilaq etc.
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>napalaaq	Krestr ; !mannapalaaq
+PIAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>narpiaq	Krestr ; !tamannarpiaq
+Gram/Dem+Pron+QAR+Der/vv:%>naqar IV_r ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron:%>narsuaq	Z2aqZmorf ; !takannarsuit
+TUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron:%>natuaq	Z1Zmorf ; !taannatuaavoq
+VIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>navik Z2-Zmorf ;
+VIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>navissuaq Z2aqZmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>kua	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>ku	K_plur ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>kunnguit K_plur ;
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>korpassuit	K_plur ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>kuaqqat	K_plur ; !taakkuaqqat
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>korpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@	Z2aqZmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg:%>suma	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>sumap	Krestr ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg:%>sumaaqqap	Krestr ; !taassumaaqqap
+ARAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg:%>sumaarannguaq	Krestr ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg:%>sumannguup	Krestr ; !taassumannguup
+PIAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg:%>sumarpiaap	Krestr ; !taassumarpiaap
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Pl:%>ku	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Pl:%>kua	K_plur ;
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Pl:%>korpassuit	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Ins+Sg:%>suminnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Ins+Pl:%>kuninnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Ins+Pl+Err/Sub:%>%TRUNCtumanik Krestr ; !PL20210118 *tamatumanik fundet på KNR.gl
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+Sg:%>sumunnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+Pl:%>kununnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+Pl+PIAQ+Der/nn:%>kununngarpiaq	Krestr ;
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+Pl:%>korpassuarnut	TrmVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+R+Der/nv:%>sumunngar	IV_r ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+R+Der/nv:%>kununngar	IV_r ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+R+Der/nv:%>sumunnar	IV_r ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+UTE+Der/nv:%>sumunngaap	XTuteXmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+UTE+Der/nv:%>kununngaap	XTuteXmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+UTE+Der/nv:%>sumunnaap	XTuteXmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Sg:%>sumani	LokVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Pl:%>kunani	LokVb ;
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Pl:%>korpassuarni	LokVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Sg+MIU+Der/nn:%>sumanimiu	Z1Zmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Pl+MIU+Der/nn:%>kunanimiu	Z1Zmorf ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Sg:%>sumanerpiaq	Krestr ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Pl:%>kunanerpiaq	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Sg:%>sumannga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Pl:%>kunannga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>kunanit AblVb ;
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Pl:%>korpassuarnit	AblVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>sumuuna	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl:%>kunatigut	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl:%>kunuunatigut	ViaVb ;
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl:%>korpassuartigut	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>kunuuna	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Sg:%>sumatut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>natut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>kunatut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Pl+Err/Sub:%>kunasut AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>kutut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>kuatut	AeqVb ;
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>korpassuartut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:%>sumaa	# ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:%>sumaak	# ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:%>sumaangaa	# ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Pl:%>korsii	# ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Pl:%>korsiiaa	# ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg+TAQ+Der/nn:%>nartaq	Z1Zmorf ; !kannartannut

LEXICON DemPron	!(demonstrative pronominer)
anna:av	DemPron1 ;
panna:pav	DemPron1 ;
qanna:qav	DemPron1 ;
inna+Orth/Arch:iv	DemPron0 ; !Rettet fra DemPron1 PL 20180510
kanna:kan	DemPron1 ;
qanna:qam	DemPron1 ;
sanna:sam	DemPron1 ;
pinnga:pik	DemPron0 ;
innga:ik	DemPron0 ;
kinnga:kig	DemPron0 ;
manna:man	DemPron1 ;	!(massuma)
TA+anna:taajav	DemPron1 ;
TA+panna:tappav	DemPron1 ;
TA+qanna:taqqav	DemPron1 ;
TA+inna:taajiv	DemPron1 ;
TA+kanna:takan	DemPron1 ;
TA+qanna:taqqam	DemPron1 ;
TA+sanna:tasam	DemPron1 ;
TA+pinnga:tappik	DemPron0 ;
TA+innga:taajik	DemPron0 ;
TA+kinnga:takkig	DemPron0 ;
TA+manna:taman	DemPron1 ;	!(tamassuma)
TA+una:taav	DemPron1 ;
